Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1 Identification and Apprehension of Criminals

12-1-1.
Rewards offered by governor.

Whenever any murder, attempt at murder, robbery, or other high crime, shall be committed in the state, and the perpetrator shall escape detection, or shall escape from custody or imprisonment, either before or after conviction, the governor may issue his or her proclamation offering a suitable reward, not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), for the apprehension of the offender.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 15, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 21, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 20, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 6, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-1-1

.

12-1-2.
Appropriations for expenses authorized by governor.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary for the payment of any services that may be authorized by the governor in the execution of the laws, the detection of crime and the apprehension of offenders, not including in the appropriation the sum to be paid under §

12-1-1

as a reward for the apprehension of offenders.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 15, § 5; P.L. 1898, ch. 572, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 21, § 5; P.L. 1918, ch. 1645, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 20, § 5; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 6, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-1-2

.

12-1-3.
Rewards offered by towns and cities.

Every town council of any town, or mayor of any city acting with the advice of the city council, may offer a suitable reward, not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) in any one case, for the detention, apprehension and conviction of any offender committing a high crime or misdemeanor within the limits of the town or city, to be paid by the town treasurer or city treasurer upon the order of the town council, or mayor and city council, out of any funds of the town or city not otherwise specifically appropriated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 40, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 50, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 51, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 333, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

12-1-3

.

12-1-4.
Division of criminal identification — Chief and assistants.

There shall be a division of criminal identification in the department of the attorney general to be in charge of a chief who shall be appointed by the attorney general to serve at the pleasure of the attorney general, and who shall devote all of his or her time to the duties of his or her office. The chief with the approval of the attorney general may appoint any assistants that he or she may deem necessary to carry out the work of the division, within the limits of any appropriation made for that purpose, and may with the approval of the attorney general discontinue the employment of any assistants at any time. The chief shall perform the functions required by the provisions of this chapter. In addition to availability of records to law enforcement agencies and officers, the records shall be made available to any attorney of record in any criminal action, and any officials of businesses which are required by federal or state law or regulation to effectuate a criminal background check of potential or prospective employees. The information shall be confidential and shall be used only by the employer for the employee’s application of employment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 977, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 620, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

12-1-4

; P.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 9.

12-1-5, 12-1-6.
Repealed.

12-1-7.
Criminal identification records — Stolen property reports.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general to procure and file for record in the office of his or her department so far as the same can be procured, fingerprints, plates, photos, outline pictures, descriptions, information, and measurements of all persons who shall be or shall have been convicted of felony, or imprisoned for violating any of the military, naval, or criminal laws of the United States or of any state, and of all well-known and habitual criminals from wherever procurable. The attorney general shall procure and keep on file in the office of the department, so far as they can be procured, fingerprints, measurements, processes, operations, signalletic cards, plates, photographs, outline pictures, measurements, and descriptions of any person who shall have been or shall be confined in any penal institution of this state, taken in accordance with the system of identification in use in any penal institution of this state. The attorney general shall also keep on file in the office the reports of lost, stolen, found, pledged, or pawned property required to be furnished to him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 135, § 2; P.L. 1927, ch. 977, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 620, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

12-1-7

; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 9.

12-1-8.
Repealed.

12-1-8.1.
Method of identification.

The bureau of criminal identification in the department of attorney general shall use fingerprints as the exclusive method of positive identification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 417, § 2.

12-1-9.
Repealed.

12-1-9.1.
Duty of police officials to furnish fingerprints.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent of the state police and the chiefs of police or town sergeants to furnish the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general within ten (10) days of arrest, the fingerprints and physical description of all persons arrested and all persons who are wanted for serious crimes or who are fugitives from justice. This section is not intended to include violations of city or town ordinances or of persons arrested for minor offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 417, § 2.

12-1-10.
Repealed.

12-1-10.1.
Photographs and descriptive information.

In the case of every offense for which an indictment has been returned or an information filed, the person for which an indictment or information has been filed, if not previously fingerprinted by the arresting police department for the offense, shall report to the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general to submit to fingerprinting, a photograph and the collection of descriptive information. In the event the individual indicted or informed against has not previously been fingerprinted for the offense is in the custody of the department of corrections or detained at a similar detention facility, the investigating police department shall obtain fingerprints and a photograph from the individual charged and submit a set of said fingerprints to the department of attorney general’s bureau of criminal identification within twenty-one (21) days of arraignment on the indictment or information.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 417, § 2.

12-1-11.
Photographs and descriptive information as to persons convicted.

In the case of every offense for which an indictment has been found or an information filed and in which the offender has been found guilty and sentenced, or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, the attorney general shall cause to be taken: (1) a photograph, (2) the name, age, weight, height, and a general description of the offender, and (3) his or her fingerprints in accordance with the fingerprint system of identification of criminals and a history of the offender as shown upon trial. In the case of all offenses triable in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol, the attorney general shall cause the fingerprints, photograph, and other information to be taken by his or her department, and in the case of all offenses triable in any other county he or she may make any arrangements for the taking of fingerprints, photographs, and information that may to him or her seem most desirable. In the case of offenses other than those that are indictable, for which an offender is committed under a sentence of imprisonment for a period of six (6) months or more, the warden or keeper of a place of detention or penal institution other than institutions designed primarily for the detention of juveniles, to which an offender is committed, shall cause to be taken, unless the court otherwise orders, a like description, photograph, fingerprints, and history of the person. The description, photographs, fingerprints, and history shall be taken by persons in the service of the state appointed by the attorney general for that purpose. All descriptions, photographs, fingerprints, and identifying matter shall be immediately transmitted to the attorney general.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 135, § 6; P.L. 1927, ch. 977, § 1; P.L. 1928, ch. 1191, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 620, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

12-1-11

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 9.

12-1-12.
Destruction or sealing of records of persons acquitted or otherwise exonerated.

Any fingerprint, photograph, physical measurements, or other record of identification, heretofore or hereafter taken by or under the direction of the attorney general, the superintendent of state police, the member or members of the police department of any city or town, or any other officer authorized by this chapter to take them, of a person under arrest, prior to the final conviction of the person for the offense then charged, shall be destroyed by all offices or departments having the custody or possession within sixty (60) days after there has been an acquittal, dismissal, no true bill, no information, or the person has been otherwise exonerated from the offense with which he or she is charged, and the clerk of court where the exoneration has taken place shall, consistent with §

12-1-12.1

, place under seal all records of the person in the case including all records of the division of criminal identification established by §

12-1-4

.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 141, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 142, § 1.]

Any person who shall violate any provision of this section shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

Requirements of this section shall also apply to persons detained by police, but not arrested or charged with an offense, or to persons against whom charges have been filed by the court, and the period of such filing has expired.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any person who has been charged with a complaint for a crime involving domestic violence where the complaint was filed upon a plea of not guilty, guilty, or nolo contendere pursuant to §

12-10-12

, must wait a period of three (3) years from the date of filing before the records associated with the charge can be expunged, sealed, or otherwise destroyed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 341, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 638, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 303, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

12-1-12.1.
Sealing of records of persons acquitted or otherwise exonerated by operation of law or by motion.

By operation of law, the court shall automatically seal the records of any criminal case that was dismissed pursuant to the district court rule of criminal procedure 48(a), including all records of the division of criminal identification established by §

12-1-4

without the requirement of filing a motion under the following circumstances:

Cases dismissed pursuant to the district court rule of criminal procedure 48(a) on or after January 1, 2023, shall be automatically sealed ninety (90) days after the dismissal; or

Cases dismissed pursuant to the district court rule of criminal procedure 48(a) prior to January 1, 2023, shall be sealed administratively by the court clerk at the request of the defendant and any sealing order of the district court entered as a result shall be sent electronically by the clerk of the court to the bureau of criminal identification established by §

12-1-4

within five (5) days of the entry of the order and shall be carried out within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the order.

Any person who is acquitted or otherwise exonerated of all counts in a criminal case, including, but not limited to, dismissals not described in subsection (a) of this section or filing of a no true bill or no information, may file a motion for the sealing of his or her court records in the case.

Any person filing a motion for sealing his or her court records pursuant to this section shall give notice of the hearing date set by the court to the department of the attorney general and the police department that originally brought the charge against the person at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing.

If the court, after the hearing at which all relevant testimony and information shall be considered, finds that the person is entitled to the sealing of the records, it shall order the sealing of the court records of the person in that case.

The clerk of the court shall, within forty-five (45) days of the order of the court granting the motion, place under seal the court records in the case in which the acquittal, dismissal, no true bill, no information, or other exoneration has been entered.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, in all cases involving a filing subsequent to a plea of not guilty, guilty, or nolo contendere to a charge of a crime involving domestic violence, the court having jurisdiction over the case shall retain the records of the case for a period of three (3) years from the date of filing. The records shall not be expunged or sealed for a period of three (3) years from the date of the filing.

The defendant shall be advised at the hearing that any and all bail money relating to a case that remains on deposit and is not claimed at the time of sealing shall be escheated to the state’s general treasury in accordance with chapter 12 of title 8.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 638, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 303, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 109, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 253, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 254, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

12-1-12.2.
Sealing of arrest records for wrongful arrest due to mistaken identity or any other reason — Notification.

Definitions.

“Law enforcement agency” means the department of attorney general; the superintendent of the state police, or his or her designee; the member, or members, of the police department of any city or town; a state or local police organization of this or any other state; the enforcement division of the department of environmental management; the office of the state fire marshal; the capitol police; a law enforcement agency of the federal government; and any agency, department, or bureau of the United States government that has, as one of its functions, the gathering of intelligence data.

“Destruction or sealing of records” means, and includes, any fingerprint, photograph, physical measurements, or other record of identification, heretofore or hereafter taken by, or under the direction of, the attorney general; the superintendent or his or her designees of state police; the member, or members, of the police department of any city or town; the enforcement division of the department of environmental management; the office of the state fire marshal; the capitol police; a law enforcement agency of the federal government; any agency, department, or bureau of the United States government that has as one of its functions the gathering of intelligence data; or any other officer authorized by this chapter to take them, of a person under arrest.

Any law enforcement agency, subsequent to the arrest of any person, that determines that such person was wrongfully or incorrectly arrested as a result of mistaken identity or any other reason, or wrongfully fingerprinted, photographed, or otherwise has generated any record of arrest for investigatory purposes and, as a result of such wrongful arrest, no charges have been filed in any court of this state, shall, within sixty (60) days of such determination that the arrest was wrongful or without probable cause, seal all such arrest records and destroy all identifying information and indices of arrest, including, but not limited to, photographs and fingerprints. DNA samples obtained from such person shall be handled in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1.5 of title 12, “DNA detection of sexual and violent offenders” during, and related to, the investigation.

Any law enforcement agency that arrests and reports such arrest to any other law enforcement agency shall, within sixty (60) days of making the determination that the arrest was wrongful or without probable cause, also notify all other agencies to which it has transmitted such identifying information and including, but not limited to, the state’s bureau of criminal identification (BCI), the National Crime Information Identity Center (NCIC), and/or any other state or federal agency that compiles, retains, or collects any arrest or identifying information of arrestees, that the arrest was wrongful and that any and all records transmitted or generated shall be sealed and/or destroyed as provided herein.

Any such person arrested and not charged shall be entitled to have all records and indices of arrest sealed and/or destroyed as provided herein regardless of any prior record of arrest or conviction that may otherwise not be eligible for expungement, pursuant to §

12-1.3-1

et seq., or sealing, pursuant to §

12-1-12

et seq.

Any law enforcement agency, upon making such determination that such an arrest was wrongful or without probable cause as provided herein, shall notify the person arrested that the charge was dismissed or that no charges have been filed and that all arrest records and indices of arrest have been sealed and/or destroyed consistent with this chapter.

Any person arrested, detained, or otherwise identified as a suspect, and who is thereafter exonerated consistent with the provisions contained herein, may deny, for any purpose, that the arrest ever occurred and under no circumstances shall such an arrestee be required to disclose the arrest for any purpose including, but not limited to, any application for employment, professional license, concealed-weapons permit, or the purchase of a firearm or other weapon.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 426, § 1.

12-1-13.
Repealed.

12-1-14.
Body attachment — Nonsupport of children.

Any body attachment issued by the family court in a case involving the bureau of family support relating to the nonsupport of children shall be entered into the state and police telecommunications system known as the Rhode Island Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, “RILETS.” The family court shall be responsible for transmitting all body attachments and cancellations of them to the attorney general’s bureau of criminal identification for distributing the body attachment information into RILETS. Within the body attachment, the information entered in RILETS shall include date of birth and social security number when available. The family court shall be responsible for transmitting information regarding all body attachments and cancellations to the attorney general’s bureau of criminal identification for entering the body attachment information into RILETS. The family court shall transmit the original body attachment to the attorney general’s bureau of criminal identification.

Any peace officer as defined in §

12-7-21

or certified constable authorized pursuant to §

9-5-10.1

shall have the authority to execute a body attachment as issued by the family court pursuant to §

8-10-3.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 12; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 19; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 19.

12-1-15.
Retaliation prohibited.

No employer shall discharge or take any disciplinary action against an employee based on the employer’s notification or obligation provisions contained in Chapter 370, Article 29 and Chapter 374 of the 1995 Public Laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 14; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 14.

12-1-16.
Improvement of lineup procedures task force.

In order to: (1) Prevent the injustice of a wrongful conviction caused by mistaken eyewitness identification; (2) Improve lineup procedures during criminal investigations; and (3) Further improve the already high quality of criminal justice in our state, the general assembly creates a taskforce to identify and recommend policies and procedures to improve the accuracy of eyewitness identifications.

The task force shall be comprised of the following or their designees:

Attorney general;

Public defender;

Superintendent of the Rhode Island state police;

President of the Rhode Island police chiefs’ association;

Head of the municipal police training academy;

President of the Rhode Island bar association;

President of the Rhode Island association of criminal defense lawyers;

A representative from a Rhode Island university with expertise in the relevant social sciences as demonstrated by teaching, publication and other scholarly applications; and

Executive director of the Rhode Island commission for Human Rights.

The task force, in consultation with eyewitness identification practitioners and experts, shall develop guidelines for policies, procedures and training with respect to the collection and handling of eyewitness evidence in criminal investigations by law enforcement agencies in Rhode Island. The purpose of the guidelines is to provide law enforcement agencies with information regarding policies and procedures proven to increase the accuracy of the crime investigation process, thus also reducing the possibility of wrongful convictions.

Guidelines for policies, procedures and training that may be considered and recommended by the task force include, but are not limited to:

Use of blind administration of lineups;

Specific instructions to be given to the eyewitness before and during the lineup to increase the accuracy of any identification, including that the purpose of the identification procedure is to exculpate the innocent as well as to identify the actual perpetrator;

Number and selection of fillers to be in lineups;

Use of sequential lineups versus nonsequential lineups;

Inclusion of only one suspect in any lineup;

Value of refraining from providing any confirmatory information to the eyewitness;

Standards and protocols to be used in the administration and conduct of an identification procedure;

Training, if any, should be made available to law enforcement personnel in the use of these procedures; and

Taking a confidence statement from the person viewing the lineup.

The task force shall submit a report on the guidelines developed and recommendations concerning their use. Minority reports may also be issued. These reports shall be presented to the governor, the chief justice of the Rhode Island supreme court, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chairpersons of the judiciary committees of both the house of representatives and the senate no later than January 1, 2011. The task force shall meet periodically thereafter in order to assess the impact of the recommendations made in the report; to conduct further research in the area of eyewitness identification; to specifically assess the use of sequential and simultaneous lineups by Rhode Island law enforcement agencies; and to consider whether, in light of that experience, the use of sequential lineups should be recommended as a “best practice.” Said meetings shall be called by agreement of the attorney general and public defender. A supplemental report from the task force shall be delivered in the same manner as its initial report and not later than April 30, 2012.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 110, § 1.

12-1-17.
Background checks for employees of religious organizations.

In order to assist Rhode Island’s religious organizations and houses of worship (hereinafter religious organization) with the ability to ensure that their staff, teachers, and employees are of good moral character, all persons eighteen (18) years of age or older seeking to work or volunteer for any religious organization shall, at the specific request of the religious organization, be required to undergo a national criminal background check for the purpose of determining whether the prospective employee or volunteer has been convicted of any crime.

Participation of any religious organization with the system of background checks created by this section is voluntary and any decision to request a national background check for any person may be made at the sole discretion of the religious organization.

“Disqualifying information” for purposes of this section shall mean those offenses included in §§

23-17-37

,

11-37-1

—

11-37-8.4

, and §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-5.3

.

Any religious organization may require any applicant for employment or volunteer activity, if that employment or activity involves routine contact with minors, to apply to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI), the department of the attorney general, the state police, or the local police department for a nationwide criminal records check. The check shall conform to the applicable federal standards, including the requirement that the applicant provide a set of fingerprints to facilitate the background check.

It shall be the responsibility of the BCI to conduct the national criminal identification check within fourteen (14) days of the applicant’s request.

If any disqualifying information is discovered with respect to the applicant, the BCI shall inform the religious organization in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying nature has been discovered. In addition, the BCI shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information.

Upon receipt of the disqualifying information from the BCI, the applicant may, within twenty (20) days of receipt thereof, request that the BCI provide a copy of the information to the religious organization which will have the discretion to determine whether the applicant is eligible for employment or volunteer status.

If no disqualifying information is found upon completion of the background check, the BCI shall notify both the applicant and the religious organization, in writing, of this fact.

Upon completion of the background check, and after the twenty-day (20) period referenced in subsection (c)(1) of this section, the BCI shall promptly destroy the fingerprints provided by the applicant.

No religious organization that disqualifies an individual from employment or volunteer activity as a result of its receipt of disqualifying information, shall be liable for civil damages or subject to any claim, cause of action, or proceeding of any nature, as a result of such disqualification.

The applicant shall be responsible for the costs of conducting the nationwide criminal records check.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 60, § 1.